Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 5. 24/7 Licenses

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 49, § 5(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 31-7-501.
24/7 licenses; definitions; account; administration and enforcement.

For purposes of this article:

“24/7 administrator” means the 24/7 sobriety program director authorized by W.S.

7-13-1710

. In the absence of a 24/7 sobriety program director, the 24/7 administrator shall mean the attorney general or his designee;

“24/7 restricted driver’s license” means a driver’s license issued under W.S. 31-7-109(m);

“24/7 sobriety program” means the program created under W.S.

7-13-1701

through

7-13-1710

;

“Department” means the Wyoming department of transportation;

“Indigent person” means a person able to produce evidence that he is eligible and qualified to participate in the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program.

The department shall prescribe reasonable rules and regulations and prescribe forms related to the issuance and revocation of 24/7 restricted driver’s licenses as provided in this article.

The department shall establish a fee chargeable to every person applying for a 24/7 restricted driver’s license. The fee shall compensate the department for all the costs directly associated with administering 24/7 restricted driver’s licenses required by this article, but in no event shall the fee exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00). The fee shall not be collected from any indigent person.

There is created the 24/7 restricted driver’s license account. All monies received by the department under subsection (c) of this section shall be deposited into the 24/7 account. Interest earned on monies in the account shall be credited to the account. All monies in the account including earned interest are continuously appropriated to the department and shall be expended only for the purpose of administering 24/7 restricted driver’s licenses required by this article.

History.

2019 ch. 49, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 49, § 5(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2019, ch. 49, § 4 provides: “On or before July 1, 2019, the department of transportation shall promulgate rules and prescribe forms as required by W.S. 31-7-501(b) as created by section 1 of this act.”

§ 31-7-502.
24/7 restricted license requirements; revocation; penalties.

A person ordered to participate pursuant to W.S. 31-5-233(n) in a 24/7 sobriety program as an alternative to the requirements of W.S. 31-5-233(f)(ii) through (iv) shall not be eligible to receive an unrestricted driver’s license until he has held the 24/7 restricted license for the period required by W.S. 31-5-233(n). The time during which a person can demonstrate enrollment in and compliance with a 24/7 sobriety program prior to conviction for the same incident shall be credited to the person’s post-conviction restricted license requirements under W.S. 31-5-233(n).

If a person ordered to participate in a 24/7 sobriety program, as described in subsection (a) of this section, fails to comply with the requirements of the program or otherwise ceases to participate in the program prior to completing the program, the 24/7 administrator shall immediately notify the department. Upon receiving notice, the department shall immediately revoke the person’s 24/7 restricted driver’s license.

A person whose 24/7 restricted driver’s license is revoked shall apply to the department for an ignition interlock restricted license for the balance of the period required by W.S. 31-5-233(n).

A person whose 24/7 restricted driver’s license is revoked under subsection (b) of this section shall not drive any motor vehicle on the highways of this state unless the person has been issued an ignition interlock restricted license for the balance of the period required by W.S. 31-5-233(f).

A person who violates subsection (d) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall:

For a first offense, be imprisoned for not less than seven (7) days nor more than six (6) months, and shall not be eligible for probation, suspension of sentence or release on any other basis until serving at least seven (7) days in jail. In addition, the person may be fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200.00) nor more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00);

For a second or subsequent violation of subsection (d) of this section during the same license revocation period, be imprisoned for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than six (6) months, and shall not be eligible for probation, suspension of sentence or release on any other basis until serving at least thirty (30) days in jail. In addition, the person may be fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200.00) nor more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).

History.

2019 ch. 49, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 49, § 5(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2019.